Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-242
Extraterritorial airport; adjoining state; powers; right of eminent domain; reciprocity.

Any state adjoining this state or any governmental agency thereof may plan, establish, acquire, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, and protect airports and air navigation facilities within this state, subject to the laws of this state applicable to airports and air navigation facilities. The adjoining state or governmental agency shall have the power of eminent domain in this state, if the adjoining state authorizes the exercise of that power therein by this state or any governmental agency thereof having any of the powers mentioned in section 3-241. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1949, c. 1, § 3, p. 56;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 29, p. 459.